test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-riokkad_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - riõkkâd: # Verb 'to whip/piestä' - full paradigm
     riõkkâd+V+Inf: riõkkâd
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riõkkam
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: riõkkak
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: reâkk
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: riõkkâp
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: riõkkveʹted
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: reäʹǩǩe
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: riõkkât
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: riõkk
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: riõʹǩǩem
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: riõʹǩǩiǩ
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: riõkki
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [riõkkim, riõkkin]
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: riõkkid
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: riõʹǩǩe
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: riõʹǩǩeš
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: riõkkâm
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg1: riõkkžem
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg2: riõkkžiǩ
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg3: riõkkâž
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Pl1: [riõkkžep, riõkkžim, riõkkžin]
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Pl2: riõkkžid
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Pl3: riõkkže
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg4: riõkkžet
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: riõkkže
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg1: riõkkčem
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg2: riõkkčiǩ
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg3: riõkkči
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Pl1: [riõkkčim, riõkkčin, riõkkčep]
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Pl2: riõkkčid
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Pl3: riõkkče
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg4: riõkkčeš
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: riõkkče
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: riõkk
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: reâkkas
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: riõkkâp
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: riõkkâd
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: reâkkaz
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+ConNeg: riõkk
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+ConNegII: riõkku
     riõkkâd+V+Actio+Ess: riõkkmen
     riõkkâd+V+Actio: riõkkâm
     riõkkâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: riõkki
     riõkkâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: riõkkâm
     riõkkâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: riõkkum
     riõkkâd+V+VAbess: [riõkkǩeânai, riõkkʼkâni, riõkkʼkani, riõkkǩâni, riõkkǩani]
     riõkkâd+V+Ger+Ess: riõkkeen
     riõkkâd+V+Ger+Instr: riõkkeeʹl
